Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-221
Wholesaler; waiver of rights prohibited; dispute settlements.

A wholesaler may not waive any of the rights granted in sections 53-201 to 53-223, and the provisions of any agreement which would have such an effect shall be null and void. Nothing in such sections shall be construed to limit or prohibit good faith dispute settlements voluntarily entered into by the parties.

Laws 1989, LB 371, § 21.